Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.19, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Employment status of election judges. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section establishes that an election judge is an employee of an appointing authority. No appointing authority shall, as a condition of appointment as an election judge, require that an individual be subject to requirements by the appointing authority that are unrelated to the ability of an individual to perform the duties of an election judge or that may otherwise be required as a condition of employment for a permanent employee of the appointing authority. new text end